North Carolina, session 2025, HB474.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 44.
"Right to Use Contraception.
"§ 90-751.1. Title.
This Article may be cited as the "Right to Use Contraception Act."
"§ 90-751.2. Legislative declaration.
The right to use contraception implicates the fundamental liberty to prevent pregnancy. It is
the policy of the State of North Carolina that this State has no legitimate governmental interest
in limiting the freedom to use contraception to prevent pregnancy."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H474-v-1*